Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,130
Criminal detention facilities; operation standards; enumerated.

The standards for the operation of criminal detention facilities shall include but not be limited to standards for:

(1) The classification and reclassification of prisoners;

(2) The rehabilitative services required for prisoners;

(3) The disciplinary procedures for prisoners;

(4) The grievance procedure for prisoners; and

(5) The search and admission of visitors.

Laws 1978, LB 212, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 83-948.04.